Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 3. Bonds Generally

Cross references. —

As to issuance of county bonds for construction, etc., of hospital, see §

18-8-102

. As to the General Obligation Public Securities Refunding Law, see §

16-5-101

et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties, etc. §§ 586 to 592; 63C Am. Jur. 2d Public Funds §§ 15 to 29; 64 Am. Jur. 2d Public Securities and Obligations §§ 33 to 214, 318 to 446.

Implied power to issue refunding bonds, 1 ALR2d 134.

Scope and application of term “other obligations” in federal statute exempting stocks, bonds, treasury notes and other obligations from taxation by or under state or municipal or local authority, 9 ALR2d 521.

Inclusion of tax-exempt property in determining value of taxable property for debt limit purposes, 30 ALR2d 903.

20 C.J.S. Counties §§ 218 to 226.

§ 18-4-301.
Authority as to issuance; maximum indebtedness permitted.

Each board of county commissioners may create an indebtedness which with the existing indebtedness of the county does not exceed the constitutional debt limitation for counties, whenever the proposition to create the debt has been submitted and approved by a vote of the people in the county.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 76, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1099; C.S. 1920, § 1333; R.S. 1931, § 29-701; C.S. 1945, § 28-201; W.S. 1957, § 18-244; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Legislative intent as to selection of procedure where not specified. —

In the absence of a reference to a particular bonding procedure, the legislature intended in enacting ch. 150, Laws 1951 (§§

18-9-101

to

18-9-103

), relative to the issuance of bonds for fairgrounds, airports, parks, etc., that the board of county commissioners should have the right and option to select and follow either of the statutory requirements then in effect (§§

18-4-301

to

18-4-303

and

18-4-306

to

18-4-310

, relative to bonds generally, or §§

18-4-401

to

18-4-409

, relative to viaducts and subway bonds) and otherwise applicable to the proposed bond issue. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

No material variance between statutes. —

An examination of the provisions of §§

18-4-301

to

18-4-303

and

18-4-306

to

18-4-310

and

18-4-401

to

18-4-409

discloses no material variance between them. In fact, many requirements in both statutes are couched in identical language. Both provide that the board of county commissioners shall cause to be levied annually upon all taxable property in the county, in addition to other authorized taxes, a tax in a sum sufficient to pay the interest on bonds as the same becomes due and to redeem the bonds upon maturity, said tax to be levied and collected in the same manner as other taxes in said county. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Delegation of taxing authority sufficient under either statute to meet constitutional requirements. —

The delegation of taxing authority is sufficient under either §§

18-4-301

to

18-4-303

and

18-4-306

to

18-4-310

, relative to bonds generally, or §§

18-4-401

to

18-4-409

, relative to viaduct and subway bonds, to meet the requirements set forth in art. 15, § 13, Wyo. Const.Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Presumption and burden of proof as to violation of or compliance with public debt limitations, 16 ALR2d 515.

Inclusion of tax-exempt property in determining value of taxable property for debt limit purposes, 30 ALR2d 903.

§ 18-4-302.
Election upon question of issuance generally; terms; purposes.

Each board of county commissioners may submit to the electors of the county the question of whether the board of county commissioners shall be authorized to issue registered coupon bonds of the county. The bonds shall be of a certain amount which with the existing indebtedness of the county shall not exceed the constitutional debt limitation for counties, shall bear interest and be issued payable and redeemable in the manner provided by this article. The purpose of the bonds is to provide for the construction, remodeling or enlargement of a courthouse or jail, construction, remodeling or enlargement of a county library or county library branches, planning, creation, construction and equipping of a fiber optic communications system, purchasing a site or the necessary furnishings and equipment for such facilities, or to construct or improve roads, highways, bridges, viaducts or subways of a permanent nature, under the supervision of the board of county commissioners or for joint facilities as provided by W.S.

18-2-105

.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 76, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 1100; C.S. 1920, § 1334; Laws 1921, ch. 67, § 1; 1923, ch. 29, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 29-702; C.S. 1945, § 28-202; Laws 1947, ch. 57, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 18-245; Laws 1961, ch. 101, § 1; 1971, ch. 254, § 14; 1975, ch. 137, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 12, § 1; ch. 28, § 1; 1997, ch. 143, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to endorsement on bond or evidence of debt that is issued within debt limit, see art. 16, § 8, Wyo. Const.

As to limitation on amount of county debt, see art. 16, § 3, Wyo. Const.

As to elections generally, see title 22.

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

Requirements of notice. —

Notice of special bond issue election on the proposition of issuance of road bonds need not state the polling places. State ex rel. Sheridan Inv. Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 28 Wyo. 30, 200 P. 469,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1921).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Inclusion of several structures or units as affecting validity of submission of proposition to voters at bond election, 4 ALR2d 617.

Rescission of vote authorizing school district or other municipal bond issue, expenditure, or tax, 68 ALR2d 1041.

Absentee voters' laws as applied to municipal bond elections, 97 ALR2d 257.

Inclusion or exclusion of first and last days in computing time for giving notice of bond issue election, which must be given a certain number of days before a known future date, 98 ALR2d 1331.

§ 18-4-303.
Proposition may be submitted at election.

The proposition to create the debt may be submitted to a vote of the qualified electors of the county at an election called, conducted, canvassed and returned in the manner provided for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 76, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 1101; C.S. 1920, § 1335; R.S. 1931, § 29-703; C.S. 1945, § 28-203; W.S. 1957, § 18-246; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2.

Polling places. —

Notice of special election on the issuance of road bonds need not state the polling places, as the same “manner” as general elections includes the polling places and machinery for general elections. State ex rel. Sheridan Inv. Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 28 Wyo. 30, 200 P. 469,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1921).

§ 18-4-304.
Form; terms; conditions.

Bonds issued by the board of county commissioners:

Shall bear lawful interest rates;

Shall be payable annually or semiannually;

May be evidenced by one (1) or two (2) sets of coupons if any but the first coupon may evidence interest for period not in excess of one (1) year;

May be in one (1) or more series;

May be issued on different dates;

Shall mature no later than twenty-five (25) years from their date of issue;

May be in different denominations;

Shall be payable in a designated medium of payment at any designated place;

May carry registration privileges;

May be subject to redemption before maturity in order or by lot or otherwise at designated times, with or without premium;

May bear privileges for reissuance and may be reissued in the same or other denominations without modification of maturities and interest rates;

May be in either coupon or registered form;

With interest coupons attached thereto shall be fully negotiable as provided by the Uniform Commercial Code — Investment Securities [§§ 34.1-8-101 through 34.1-8-603].

Each holder of the bond or coupon, by accepting same does conclusively agree that the bond or coupon except as otherwise provided is fully negotiable within the meaning of the Uniform Commercial Code — Investment Securities [§§ 34.1-8-101 through 34.1-8-603].

The various annual maturities shall commence not later than the fifth year after the date of the bonds. All bonds shall mature serially in any manner the board may determine.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 55, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Law reviews. —

See “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

§ 18-4-305.
Form; execution; payment; presumed valid.

Bonds shall be signed by the chairman of the board of county commissioners and countersigned by the county treasurer or his deputy. Any coupons shall be signed by the county treasurer or his deputy. The county clerk shall endorse a certificate upon every bond that it is issued pursuant to law and is within the lawful debt limit of the county. The board of county commissioners may authorize another member of the board to sign any bond or certificate in place of the chairman or county clerk. It is not necessary for any bond to bear the seal of the county. Bonds and coupons shall otherwise be in such form as the board may determine. The board may utilize a statutory form of bond which shall include the following details:

The name of the county and the date of the bond;

The principal amount thereof and interest rate or rates payable;

The place or places and time or times of payment of principal and interest;

The prior redemption option, if any;

A recital that the bond is one of a series approved at an election held for that purpose, that the total indebtedness of the county does not exceed the lawful debt limit of the county and that the bond has been issued under the authority of, in full compliance with and for a purpose authorized by the constitution and by law.

A bond delivered to the purchaser in the optional statutory form shall:

Be payable in lawful money of the United States of America without deduction for exchange or collection charges;

Be conclusively presumed to have been issued for value;

Be payable upon presentation and surrender of the bond and the attached coupons as they severally become due;

If not paid upon presentation at maturity, continue to draw interest until the principal thereof is paid in full;

Be presumed to have been issued by the proper officers of the county under and by virtue of and in full conformity with the constitution and laws of Wyoming, any amendments thereto, and all other laws thereunto enabling; and

Be incontestable as hereafter provided.

Any resolution of a board of county commissioners authorizing bonds may provide that each bond therein authorized shall recite that it is issued under the authority of W.S.

18-4-304

and

18-4-305

. The recital shall conclusively impart full compliance with all the provisions hereof and all bonds issued containing the recital are incontestable for any cause whatsoever after their delivery for value.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 55, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

§ 18-4-306.
Notice of intention to issue and sell.

The board shall give notice by posting on the county’s official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and by publication in the county’s designated official newspaper.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 76, § 6; C.S. 1910, § 1104; C.S. 1920, § 1338; R.S. 1931, § 29-706; C.S. 1945, § 28-206; Laws 1953, ch. 20, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 18-249; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2014 ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

rewrote the section which formerly read: “The board shall give notice by publication in some newspaper published in the county if there be one, otherwise by three (3) notices posted in the county, one of which shall be at the courthouse door of its intention to issue and negotiate the bonds and to invite bidders therefor. The notice shall also be published in some newspaper of general circulation in Cheyenne.”

§ 18-4-307.
Engraving; registration; endorsement.

After ascertaining the best terms and the lowest interest at which the bonds can be negotiated the board shall secure the proper engraving and printing and consecutive numbering thereof and the bonds shall be properly prepared and executed. When executed they shall be registered by the county clerk in a public record book kept for that purpose showing the number, date, amount of bond, time and place of payment, rate of interest, number of coupons attached and any other description for future identification. The county clerk shall endorse and officially sign a certificate upon every bond stating that it is within the lawful debt limit of the county and is issued according to law.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 76, § 7; C.S. 1910, § 1105; C.S. 1920, § 1339; R.S. 1931, § 29-707; C.S. 1945, § 28-207; W.S. 1957, § 18-250; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-4-308.
Treasurer to register bonds in book; information to be shown.

The county treasurer shall keep a book in which shall be registered all bonds issued showing the number, date of issue, to whom issued, amount of bond, date of redemption and payment of interest and principal.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 76, § 8; C.S. 1910, § 1106; C.S. 1920, § 1340; R.S. 1931, § 29-708; C.S. 1945, § 28-208; W.S. 1957, § 18-251; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-4-309.
Tax levy for purpose of redemption; payment from general fund; reimbursement.

The board of county commissioners shall annually levy upon all taxable property in the county, in addition to other authorized taxes, a sufficient sum to pay the interest on all bonds and shall at least five (5) years before the bonds become optional, and in time to provide means for their payment, annually levy not less than one (1) mill to pay the bonds as they become optional. All such taxes shall be levied, assessed and collected as other county taxes until the bonds and interest are fully paid. Should the tax for payment of interest on bonds issued not be levied or collected in time for payment the interest shall be paid from monies in the general fund of the county and the money so used shall be repaid to the general fund out of the first monies collected from taxes.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 76, § 9; C.S. 1910, § 1107; C.S. 1920, § 1341; R.S. 1931, § 29-709; C.S. 1945, § 28-209; W.S. 1957, § 18-252; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-4-310.
Payment of bonds guaranteed; effect of county division.

The faith, credit and all taxable property within the county as constituted at the time of issue are and shall continue pledged to the payment of the principal and interest of the bonds. In the event of the division of any such county the segregated territory is relieved from any obligation occasioned by the issuance of the bonds when the county acquiring such territory pays its proportionate share as provided by W.S.

18-1-316

through

18-1-320

.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 76, § 10; C.S. 1910, § 1108; C.S. 1920, § 1342; R.S. 1931, § 29-710; C.S. 1945, § 28-210; W.S. 1957, § 18-253; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to organization of new counties, see §§

18-1-301

to

18-1-320

.